Wisconsin, session 2025, AB51.
do enact as follows:AB51,11Section 1. 19.32 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB51,2,12219.32 (1) “Authority” means any of the following having custody of a record: a 3state or local office, elective official, agency, board, commission, committee, council, 4department or public body corporate and politic created by the constitution or by 5any law, ordinance, rule or order; a governmental or quasi-governmental 6corporation except for the Bradley center sports and entertainment corporation; a 7special purpose district; any court of law; the assembly or senate; a nonprofit 8corporation which receives more than 50 percent of its funds from a county or a 9municipality, as defined in s. 59.001 (3), and which provides services related to 10public health or safety to the county or municipality; a university police department 11under s. 175.42; an interscholastic athletic association that elects to be governed by 12this subchapter; or a formally constituted subunit of any of the foregoing.AB51,213Section 2. 19.32 (1db) of the statutes is created to read:AB51,2,171419.32 (1db) “Interscholastic athletic association” means a nonprofit 15association, as defined in s. 184.01 (2), or a nonstock, nonprofit corporation 16organized under ch. 181, that coordinates athletic events or contests for students 17enrolled in grades 9 to 12 in public schools.AB51,318Section 3. 19.36 (17) and (18) of the statutes are created to read:AB51,2,211919.36 (17) Interscholastic athletic association referee records. An 20interscholastic athletic association that elects to be governed by this subchapter 21may withhold access to records concerning individual referees.AB51,3,222(18) Interscholastic athletic association pupil records. Records 23concerning an individual pupil maintained by an interscholastic athletic 1association that elects to be governed by this subchapter are not subject to the right 2of inspection or copying under s. 19.35 (1).AB51,43Section 4. 19.82 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB51,3,13419.82 (1) “Governmental body” means a state or local agency, board, 5commission, committee, council, department or public body corporate and politic 6created by constitution, statute, ordinance, rule or order; a governmental or quasi-7governmental corporation except for the Bradley center sports and entertainment 8corporation; a local exposition district under subch. II of ch. 229; a long-term care 9district under s. 46.2895; an interscholastic athletic association that elects to be 10governed by this subchapter; or a formally constituted subunit of any of the 11foregoing, but excludes any such body or committee or subunit of such body which is 12formed for or meeting for the purpose of collective bargaining under subch. I, IV, or 13V of ch. 111.AB51,514Section 5. 19.82 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:AB51,3,181519.82 (1m) “Interscholastic athletic association” means a nonprofit 16association, as defined in s. 184.01 (2), or a nonstock, nonprofit corporation 17organized under ch. 181, that coordinates athletic events or contests for students 18enrolled in grades 9 to 12 in public schools.AB51,619Section 6. 118.1335 of the statutes is created to read:AB51,4,220118.1335 Interscholastic athletic association membership. No school 21district may be a member of an interscholastic athletic association, as defined in s. 119.32 (1db), unless the interscholastic athletic association elects to be governed by 2subchs. II and V of ch. 19.AB51,4,33